Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
CERTIFICATES OF HAWAIIAN BIRTH

§338-41 Issuance; procedure. (a) The
department of health may make regulations respecting the form of Hawaiian birth
certificates and certified copies of such certificates and other matters
relating to Hawaii birth certificates as appear necessary and the regulations,
when approved and made in accordance with chapter 91, shall have the force of
law. The department shall furnish the form of the certificates and copies made
therefrom.

(b) Any certificate of Hawaiian birth issued
heretofore under or by virtue of any law of the Territory of Hawaii or the
State, shall be prima facie evidence of the facts therein stated. [L 1911, c
96, §1; am L 1923, c 246, §1; RL 1925, §196; am L 1927, c 202, §1; RL 1935,
§7610; RL 1945, §12910; am L 1951, c 132, §1; RL 1955, §57-40; am L Sp 1959 2d,
c 1, §9; am L 1965, c 96, §39; HRS §338-41; am L 1970, c 11, §1; am L 1972, c
66, §1(4)]

Case Notes

Prima facie evidence overcome by competent evidence of
nonidentification. 4 U.S.D.C. Haw. 258.

Certificate not controlling upon U.S. immigration officials
re admission of Chinese. 217 F. 48; 35 Op. U.S. Att. Gen. 69.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next